Utah statutes.
63J-1-214.   Warrants -- Not to be drawn until claim processed -- Redemption.

(1)  No warrant to cover any claim against any appropriation or fund shall be drawn until such claim has been processed as provided by law.

(2)  The state treasurer shall return all redeemed warrants to the state fiscal officer for purposes of reconciliation, post-audit and verification of the state treasurer's fund balances.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

